Arkansas statutes. Constitution Of The State Of Arkansas Of 1874
AMEND. 85.
[VOTING AND ELECTIONS AMENDMENT] (CONST., ART. 3, §§ 1, 2, 8, AND 10, AMENDED, CONST., ART. 3, § 5, REPEALED).

Publisher's Notes.

This amendment amended Ark. Const., Art. 3, §§ 1, 2, repealed Ark. Const., Art. 3, § 5, and amended Ark. Const., Art. 3, §§ 8 and 10. The amendments to those sections are incorporated within those sections. The amendment, effective December 4, 2008, was proposed by S.J.R. 4 during the 2007 Regular Session and adopted at the 2008 general election by a vote of 714,128 for and 267,326 against.

The bracketed heading was added by the Publisher.